Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Chapter 1. Stock Corporations.

§§ 13.1-1 through 13.1-200.

Repealed by Acts 1985, c. 522, effective January 1, 1986.

Cross references.

For provisions as to stock corporations, see now §§

13.1-601

through 13.1-800. For provisions as to industrial development corporations, see now §§

13.1-981

through

13.1-998

.

Editor’s note.

Sections 13.1-3, 13.1-10.1 and 13.1-16 were also repealed by Acts 1976, c. 84, Acts 1981, c. 253 and Acts 1972, c. 580, respectively. Section 13.1-53 was also repealed by Acts 1975, c. 500.